Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,136
Statute of limitations.

Prosecution for violation of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act shall be commenced within three years after the date on which the violation occurred.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 136;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 63.